Mississippi statutes. Title 15. Limitations of Actions and Prevention of Frauds
Chapter 1. Limitation of Actions
§ 15-1-69.
Commencement of new action subsequent to abatement or defeat of original action.

If in any action, duly commenced within the time allowed, the writ shall be abated, or the action otherwise avoided or defeated, by the death of any party thereto, or for any matter of form, or if, after verdict for the plaintiff, the judgment shall be arrested, or if a judgment for the plaintiff shall be reversed on appeal, the plaintiff may commence a new action for the same cause, at any time within one year after the abatement or other determination of the original suit, or after reversal of the judgment therein, and his executor or administrator may, in case of the plaintiff’s death, commence such new action, within the said one year.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 57, art. 1 (16); 1857, ch. 57, art. 19; 1871, § 2163; 1880, § 2686; 1892, § 2756; 1906, § 3116; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2480; 1930, § 2314; 1942, § 744.

§ 15-1-71.
Limitation of setoff.

All the provisions of this chapter shall apply to the case of any debt or demand on the contract, alleged by way of setoff on the part of a defendant. The time of limitation of such debt or demand shall be computed in like manner as if an action had been commenced therefor at the time when the plaintiff’s action was commenced. The fact that a setoff is barred shall not preclude the defendant from using it as such if he held it against the debt sued on before it was barred.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 57, art. 22; 1871, § 2166; 1880, § 2687; 1892, § 2756a; 1906, § 3117; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2481; 1930, § 2317; 1942, § 747.

§ 15-1-73.
New promise to be in writing; effect of new promise by one or more joint contractors as against non-promisors.

In actions founded upon any contract, an acknowledgment or promise shall not be evidence of a new or continuing contract whereby to take any case out of the operation of the provisions of this chapter or to deprive any party of the benefit thereof, unless such acknowledgment or promise be made or contained by or in some writing signed by the party chargeable thereby. Where there shall be two or more joint contractors, one or more of them shall not lose the benefit of the provisions of this chapter so as to be chargeable, by reason only of an acknowledgment or promise made or signed by any other or others of them. In actions against joint contractors, if the plaintiff be barred as to one or more of the defendants but be entitled to recover against any other or others of them, by virtue of a new acknowledgment or promise, or otherwise, judgment shall be given for the plaintiff as to any of the defendants against whom he is entitled to recover, and for the other defendants against the plaintiff.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 57, art. 6 (16); 1857, ch. 57, art. 21; 1871, § 2165; 1880, § 2688; 1892, § 2757; 1906, § 3118; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2482; 1930, § 2318; 1942, § 748.

§ 15-1-75.
Bar of statute of limitations against one does not affect another jointly interested.

In all cases where the interests are joint, one shall not be barred because another jointly interested is, and the statute of limitations provided in this chapter shall be severally applied, and not jointly, to the right of actions, in whatever cause, pertaining to each of all the parties, though jointly interested.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1906, § 3128; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2492; 1930, § 2320; 1942, § 750.

§ 15-1-77.
Effect upon limitations of concurrent jurisdiction in courts of common law and of equity.

Whenever there be a concurrent jurisdiction in the courts of common law and in the courts of equity of any cause of action, the provisions of this chapter limiting a time for the commencement of a suit for such cause of action in a court of common law, shall apply to all suits to be brought for the same cause in a court of chancery.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 57, art. 30; 1871, § 2174; 1880, § 2695; 1892, § 2762; 1906, § 3124; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2488; 1930, § 2321; 1942, § 751.

§ 15-1-79.
Limitations inapplicable to suits on certain obligations of banks and moneyed corporations.

None of the provisions of this chapter shall apply to suits brought to enforce payment of notes, bills, or evidences of debt issued by any bank or moneyed corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 57, art. 27; 1871, § 2171; 1880, § 2690; 1892, § 2758; 1906, § 3119; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2483; 1930, § 2319; 1942, § 749.

§ 15-1-81.
Actions on nonnegotiable promissory notes [For effective date and applicability, see subsection (6)].

An action to enforce the obligations of a party to pay a nonnegotiable promissory note payable at a definite time must be commenced within six (6) years after the due date or dates stated in the promissory note, or if a due date is accelerated, within six (6) years after the accelerated date.

If demand for payment is made to the maker of a nonnegotiable promissory note payable on demand, an action to enforce the obligation of a party to pay the promissory note must be commenced within six (6) years after the demand. If no demand for payment is made to the maker, an action to enforce the promissory note is barred if neither principal nor interest on the promissory note has been paid for a continuous period of ten (10) years.

For purposes of this section, a “nonnegotiable promissory note” is an unconditional written undertaking to pay absolutely and in any event a fixed amount of money signed by the person undertaking to pay the money that is not an “instrument” under Section 75-3-104(b). Nonnegotiable promissory notes for purposes of this section include, but are not limited to, promissory notes that: (a) bear a variable rate of interest or provide for interest by reference to information not contained in the promissory note; (b) provide for interest after default; (c) are nonrecourse to the person undertaking to pay the money; or (d) qualify as “instruments” under Section 75-9-102(a)(47).

This section shall not apply to negotiable promissory notes, drafts, checks, certificates of deposit or any other instrument or item for which Section 75-3-118 provides the applicable statute of limitations. Neither a lease nor a security agreement is a promissory note for purposes of this section. A promissory note is not investment property as defined in Section 75-9-102(a)(49), a letter of credit, or writings that evidence a right to payment arising out of the use of a credit or charge card or information contained on or for use with the card. It is the intention of this section that a “note,” as defined in Section 75-3-104(e), and nonnegotiable promissory notes, as defined in this section, shall have the same statutes of limitations.

This section shall not apply to obligations arising from retail installment contracts. For purposes of this section, a “retail installment contract” is a contract for the sale of goods under which the buyer makes periodic payments and the seller retains a security interest in the goods. For the purposes of this section, “goods” have the same meaning as the definition of “goods” in Section 75-9-102(a)(44).

This section takes effect on July 1, 2012, and shall apply to all nonnegotiable promissory notes for which the statute of limitations in effect immediately prior to that date has not run. This section shall have no application to promissory notes for which the statute of limitations has run prior to July 1, 2012.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 506, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2010.